Hawaii statutes.
§132D-10 Permits. A permit shall be
required for the purchase and use of:

(1) Any consumer fireworks commonly known as
firecrackers upon payment of a fee of $25;

(2) Any aerial devices, display fireworks, or
articles pyrotechnic for the purposes of section 132D-16 upon payment of a fee
of $110; and

(3) Any consumer fireworks for the purposes of
section 132D-5 or for cultural uses that occur at any time other than during
the periods prescribed in section 132D-3(1) upon a payment of a fee of $25. [L
1994, c 180, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 233, §10; am L 2006, c 183, §12; am L 2008,
c 38, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next